Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.170

Cancellation of scrap metal license—Refusal of issuance.

If a person whose scrap metal license has previously been canceled for cause by the department of licensing files an application for a license to conduct business as a scrap metal processor, recycler, or supplier, or if the department is of the opinion that the application is not filed in good faith or that the application is filed by some person as a subterfuge for the real person in interest whose license has previously been canceled for cause, the department may refuse to issue the person a license to conduct business as a scrap metal processor, recycler, or supplier.

[ 2013 c 322 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.